sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Stojany na akvária: Rámové boxové stojany; Skrinkové stojany; Stojany na dve nádrže; Stojany z tepaného železa
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akváriumállványok: Dobozkeretes állványok; Szekrényállványok; Dupla tartályos állványok; Kovácsoltvas-állványok
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Supporti per acquari: Supporti per telaio a scatola; Supporti per armadietti; Supporti per doppio serbatoio; Supporti in ferro battuto
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > ที่ตั้งตู้ปลา: ขาตั้งโครงกล่อง; ขาตั้งตู้; ขาตั้งตู้แบบคู่; ขาตั้งเหล็กดัด
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水槽スタンド: ボックスフレームスタンド; キャビネットスタンド; ダブルタンクスタンド; 錬鉄製スタンド
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Стойки за аквариум: Стойки тип кутия; Стойки за шкафове; Двойни стойки за резервоари; Стойки от ковано желязо
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Подставки и тумбы для аквариумов: Каркасные стойки; Тумбы; Подставки для двух аквариумов; Стойки из кованого железа
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Supports pour aquariums: Supports de cadre en boîte; Supports à armoire; Supports pour aquariums doubles; Supports en fer forgé
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Standuri pentru acvariu: Standuri tip cutie; Standuri tip dulap; Standuri pentru acvarii duble; Standuri din fier forjat
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱支架: 箱型框架; 櫥櫃立架; 雙魚缸立架; 鍛鐵立架
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaariojalustat: Laatikkojalustat; Kaappijalustat; Kahden akvaarion jalustat; Takorautajalustat
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų stovai: Rėminiai stovai; Spintelių tipo stovai; Dvigubi akvariumų stovai; Kalti geležiniai stovai
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Kệ để bể cá: Kệ khung dạng hộp; Kệ tủ; Kệ để bể cá hai tầng; Kệ sắt rèn
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Szafki pod akwaria: Stelaże ramowe; Szafki; Podwójne szafki pod akwaria; Stelaże z kutego żelaza
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Akvarieställ: Lådramstativ; Skåpsställ; Dubbla tankstativ; Stativ i smidesjärn
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관 스탠드: 박스프레임 스탠드; 캐비넷 스탠드; 2단 탱크 스탠드; 연철 스탠드
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium Stands: Box Frame Stands; Cabinet Stands; Double Tank Stands; Wrought Iron Stands
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Aquariumständer: Kastenrahmenpodeste; Schrankpodeste; Doppeltankpodeste; Schmiedeeiserne Podeste
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Stojala za akvarije: Stojala v obliki okvirja; Stojala za omarice; Stojala za dvojne rezervoarje; Stojala iz kovanega železa
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Standere til akvarium: Kasserammestandere; Skabsstandere; Dobbelte tankstandere; Standere af smedejern
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Podstavce pro akvária: Stojany s kostrou; Skříňky pod akvária; Stojany pro dvě nádrže; Stojany z kovaného železa
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Akvariestativer: Boksrammestativer; Skapstativer; Doble tankstativ; Stativ av smijern
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Βάσεις ενυδρείου: Βάσεις πλαισίων κουτιού; Βάσεις ντουλαπιών; Διπλές βάσεις δεξαμενών; Βάσεις από σφυρήλατο σίδερο
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Stalci za akvarij: Stalci za okvir akvarija; Stalci za ormare; Stalci za dvostruke akvarije; Stalci od kovanog željeza
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族箱支架: 箱架支架; 柜式支架; 双层鱼缸架; 锻铁支架
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum Stantları: Kutu Çerçeve Standları; Dolap Standları; Çift Tanklı Standlar; Ferforje Standlar
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Suportes para aquários: Estruturas para aquários; Armários para aquários; Suportes para tanques duplos; Suportes de ferro forjado
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Suportes para aquário: Suportes para molduras de caixa; Suportes de gabinete; Suportes para tanques duplos; Suportes de ferro forjado
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Aquariummeubels: Boxframemeubels; Kastmeubels; Dubbele tankmeubels; Smeedijzeren meubels
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Bases para acuarios: Bases de marco de caja; Bases para armarios; Bases para acuarios dobles; Bases de hierro forjado